Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 1. Generally
§ 41-3-916.
Priority of rights when 1 source of supply.

Where underground waters in different aquifers are so interconnected as to constitute in fact one source of supply, or where underground waters and the waters of surface streams are so interconnected as to constitute in fact one source of supply, priorities of rights to the use of all such interconnected waters shall be correlated and such single schedule of priorities shall relate to the whole common water supply. The state engineer may by order adopt any of the corrective controls specified in W.S.

41-3-915

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 41-133.

Reserved water doctrine does not extend to groundwater.

In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (U.S. 1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (U.S. 1989), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 41-3-917.
Change of location of well without loss of priority; appeal from action of state board of control or state engineer.

An appropriator of underground water may change the location of his well to a point within the same aquifer in the vicinity of the original location, without loss of priority, by securing approval of the state board of control if the groundwater right has been adjudicated or if the groundwater right has not been adjudicated but the water has been applied to beneficial use. In cases involving domestic or stock water wells which are not adjudicated but the water has been applied to beneficial use, the state engineer may approve a change of location. If the right is not adjudicated and the water has not been applied to beneficial use, approval for the change in location may be granted by the state engineer. No petition shall be granted if the rights of other appropriators shall be injuriously affected thereby. No petition granted shall increase the total amount of the appropriation of water set forth in the original permit. The state board of control and the state engineer may make such regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The state engineer may approve a change of well location even if water has not been applied to a beneficial use.

A decision by the state engineer granting or denying a petition to change the location of an unadjudicated right under this section may be appealed to the board of control. An appeal may be taken to the district court pursuant to W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

from an order of the board of control:

Affirming or reversing a decision of the state engineer appealed to the board under this subsection; or

Granting or denying a petition to change the location of an adjudicated right under this section.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 41-134; Laws 1965, ch. 137, § 1; 1985, ch. 169, § 1.

This section does not authorize partial transfer of adjudicated underground water right of well.

Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Control, 647 P.2d 1365,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 41-3-918.
Appeals.

Any person aggrieved by an order of the board or of the state engineer concerning underground water, or by their or his failure to act, may appeal in the manner provided by W.S.

41-4-517

, and the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 41-135; Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12 W.R.A.P.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 41-3-919.
Prohibited acts; penalty for violation.

Any person who withdraws underground water or who fails to stop or reduce the flow of underground water in violation of any order of the state engineer made pursuant to this act [§§

41-3-901

through

41-3-938

], or any person who does not have a permit, certificate or vested right to appropriate underground water who shall withdraw underground water from any well other than a well for stock or domestic purposes as defined in W.S.

41-3-907

, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished under W.S.

41-3-616

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 41-137; Laws 1969, ch. 213, § 5; 1979, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “W.S.

41-3-616

” for “W.S.

41-3-614

.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Challenge of Mine Dewatering to Western Water Law and the New Mexico Response,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 445 (1980).